New York, session 2025-2026, S7409.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Chapter 670 of the laws of 2024 relating to authorizing the 2 lease of certain lands for the Albany NanoTech Complex, is amended by 3 adding a new section 5-a to read as follows: 4 § 5-a. 1. The provisions of this section shall only apply to employees 5 in the unclassified service at the state university of New York. 6 2. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 7 state university of New York or an affiliated or associated entity of 8 the state university of New York shall not contract out to the ground 9 lessee or any subsidiary of the ground lessee or the research foundation 10 for the state university of New York for any services or privatize any 11 services currently being performed by employees in the unclassified 12 service at the state university of New York at Albany. All such func- 13 tions and services currently performed by employees in unclassified 14 service shall be performed by employees in the unclassified service. 15 3. Nothing in this act relating to the lease of property to private 16 entities for the development, construction, or operation of facilities 17 shall be deemed to waive or impair any rights or benefits of employees 18 of the state university of New York that otherwise would be available to 19 them pursuant to the terms of agreements between the certified represen- 20 tatives of such employees and the state of New York or provisions of 21 article fourteen of the civil service law. SUNY and the state of New 22 York acknowledge their obligations as an employer and agree that they 23 will not exercise their right to contract out for services under any 24 applicable collective bargaining agreement. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10360-02-5